Massachusetts, session 194th, H4136.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Chapter 30 of the Acts of
2005 relative to the withdrawal of stabilization funds in the Town of Leicester is hereby
rescinded.
of 1